California statutes. Public Utilities Code
A customer of a participating electrical or gas corporation who is the owner or mortgagor of real property or tenant of such property with a written consent of the owner may apply to the corporation for home insulation assistance and financing. To qualify for financing, such customer must meet the credit criteria as may reasonably be established by the corporation as approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

2785.

Upon approval of an application, the corporation shall arrange for a licensed contractor to perform the necessary work. Upon approval of an estimate by the customer and the corporation, the corporation shall direct the work to commence. All attic insulation installations shall meet or exceed requirements applicable at the time of installation or as may be established for existing residential structures, except where such compliance is impossible or impractical in an existing structure and an alternative method or procedure providing satisfactory results is available. The corporation shall arrange for inspection of a representative portion of the work performed pursuant to
 this chapter. As used in this section, the term “attic” means any air spaces between the ceiling and roof of a residential dwelling which are accessible for the purpose of the installation of insulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

2786.

An electrical or gas corporation shall provide for payment by a customer for whom home insulation has been installed pursuant to this chapter through such periodic billing procedures as may be established by the corporation. The corporation may require an initial payment toward the insulation services of not greater than 20 percent with the balance due payable in equal installments during a period of 36 months following completion of the work, or at such greater rate of repayment as the customer may elect. Finance charges shall not be greater than the maximum allowable finance charges permitted for retail installment contracts. Acceptable credit cards may be utilized in lieu
 of these financial arrangements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

2787.

As an alternative to the provisions of Section 2786, an electrical or gas corporation may conclude financial arrangements with one or more lending institutions in this state engaged in making home improvement loans to provide loans to customers for purposes of home insulation pursuant to this chapter. The corporation may provide for payment of the loan balance by the customer through the corporation’s regular bill for public utility services. Any such financial arrangements shall include all of the following provisions:

(a) The amount financed shall be payable in equal installments during a period of 36 months
 following completion of the work, or at such greater rate of repayment as the customer may elect.

(b) Provision that the corporation shall not be liable to the lending institution in the event of the customer’s default.

(c) Provision that approval of the customer’s credit shall be at the option of the lending institution.

Notwithstanding any language contained in this section, acceptable credit cards may be utilized in lieu of the above provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

2788.

The commission shall allow for purposes of setting the rates of any electrical or gas corporation participating in a home insulation assistance and financing program all expenses which the commission finds are reasonably related to the implementation and administration of the program, including commercial advertising. The commission may disapprove any such advertising or promotion which the commission finds is not reasonably designed to promote the success of the home insulation financial assistance program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

2789.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part, the commission may permit or require any electrical or gas corporation subject to its jurisdiction to institute energy conservation programs for its customers, including related financial assistance at terms found reasonable by the commission. Such terms may include any provision of this chapter. This chapter shall not apply to solar water heating systems or active solar space conditioning systems. The commission shall initiate appropriate actions to secure exemptions or waivers which may be required under federal law. Nothing in this chapter shall expand, limit, or contract the general powers of the commission contained in this part
 or the authority of the commission regarding the terms and conditions of service by a utility. Any work requiring a license pursuant to Chapter 9 of Division 3 (commencing with Section 7000) of the Business and Professions Code which is performed pursuant to such an energy conservation program shall be performed by a licensed contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1064.)
-------------------------------------------

2790.

(a) The commission shall require an electrical or gas corporation to perform home weatherization services for low-income customers if the commission determines that a significant need for those services exists in the corporation’s service territory, taking into consideration both the cost-effectiveness of the services and the policy of reducing the hardships facing low-income households.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “weatherization” may include, where feasible, any of the following measures for any dwelling unit:

(A) Attic insulation.

(B) Caulking.

(C) Weatherstripping.

(D) Low-flow showerhead.

(E) Waterheater blanket.

(F) Door and building envelope repairs that reduce air infiltration.

(2) The commission shall direct an electrical or gas corporation to provide as many of these measures as are feasible for each eligible low-income dwelling unit.

(c) For
 purposes of this section, “weatherization” may also include other building conservation measures, energy management technology, energy-efficient appliances, and energy education programs determined by the commission to be feasible, taking into consideration for all measures both the cost-effectiveness of the measures as a whole and the policy of reducing energy-related hardships facing low-income households.

(d) Weatherization programs shall use the needs assessment pursuant to Section 382.1 to maximize efficiency of delivery.

(e) For purposes of this section, “energy management technology” may include a product, service, or software that allows a customer to better understand and manage electricity or gas use in the customer’s home.

(f) (1) For purposes of this section,
 “low-income customers” means persons and families whose household income is at or below 250 percent of the federal poverty level.

(2) The commission shall not increase the authorized budgets for the Energy Savings Assistance Program based on the expansion of income eligibility made under paragraph (1).

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 248, Sec. 2.   (SB 756)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Transfer of Facilities in Master-Metered Mobilehome Parks and Manufactured Housing Communities to Gas or Electric Corporation Ownership [2791. - 2799.]

2791.

(a) The owner of a master-metered mobilehome park or manufactured housing community that provides gas or electric service to residents may transfer ownership and operational responsibility to the gas or electric corporation providing service in the area in which the park or community is located pursuant to this chapter, or as the park or community owner and the serving gas or electric corporation mutually agree.

(b) Costs, including both costs related to transfer procedures and
 costs related to construction, related to the transfer of ownership process, whether or not resulting in a transfer of ownership to the serving gas or electric corporation, shall not be passed through to the park or community residents. Costs related to the transfer of ownership process, whether or not resulting in a transfer of ownership to the serving gas or electric corporation, shall not be passed through to the gas or electric corporation, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(c) Residents of mobilehome parks and manufactured housing communities constructed after January 1, 1997, shall be individually metered and served by gas and electric distribution facilities owned, operated, and maintained by the gas or electric corporation providing the service in the area where the new park or community is located consistent with the commission’s orders regarding unbundling, aggregation, master-metering, and selection of suppliers by
 residential customers. Each gas and electric corporation shall cooperate with the owner of any park or community constructed after January 1, 1997, to ensure timely and expeditious installation of the gas and electric distribution system and to eliminate any delay in the design, construction, permitting, and operation of the gas and electric system in the park or community.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2792.

(a) Upon receipt of a written notice of intent to transfer from the mobilehome park or manufactured housing community owner, the gas or electric corporation shall within 90 days do all of the following:

(1) Meet with the park or community owner to describe the procedures involved in a transfer of ownership and operation responsibility.

(2) Perform a preliminary review of the gas or electric system, or both, in the park
 or community.

(3) Inspect documentation provided by the park or community owner of the construction, operation, and condition of the gas or electric system, or both.

(4) Advise the park or community owner concerning the general condition of the plant and equipment, along with a preliminary opinion concerning the extent of construction work or other activity necessary to comply with Section 2794.

(5) Offer a preliminary nonbinding estimate of the cost of transfer.

(6) Offer the park or community owner a preliminary nonbinding cost estimate to perform an engineering evaluation and estimate the construction work and equipment replacement to be performed by the gas or electric corporation at the owner’s expense.

(b) The gas or electric corporation shall develop the cost estimate for the engineering evaluation in good faith using the same methodology as is used for similar projects. The preliminary cost estimate shall be effective for a minimum of 90 days. The gas or electric corporation shall give the owner timely notice of any increase in the estimated cost of the engineering evaluation.

(c) During 1997, gas and electric corporations shall make a good faith effort to respond within 90 days to the notice provided in subdivision (a).

(d) The gas or electric corporation may charge a fee for the initial inspection not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2793.

(a) Upon receipt from the park or community owner of a deposit representing the gas or electric corporation’s estimated cost of the engineering evaluation, the gas or electric corporation shall, within 90 days, do all of the following:

(1) Develop an engineering plan for bringing the gas or electric system to the standard described in Section 2794, incorporating all relevant documentation including plans, drawings, engineering studies, and other existing documentation provided by
 the park or community owner, and considering incorporation of all portions of the gas or electric system found to be used, useful, and compatible.

(2) Develop an appraisal of the value to the gas or electric corporation of the physical plant and equipment found to be used, useful, and compatible that comprise the gas or electric system, or both, to be transferred, including an estimate of the remaining useful life of the gas or electric system. The value to the gas or electric corporation shall take into consideration the expenditures by the park or community owner to comply with the criteria established in Section 2794.

(3) Present a proposal, in sufficient detail to serve as a bid document for the transfer of ownership of the system to the gas or electric corporation.

(b) The proposal may be based on either of the
 following approaches or as the park or community owner and the gas or electric corporation mutually agree:

(1) The park or community owner is responsible for all construction and equipment replacement activity, if any, at the park or community owner’s expense less any credits or allowances, if any, including credits or allowances based on incremental increases in the gas or electric corporation’s revenues associated with the park or community owner’s investment in the gas or electric system. The construction and equipment replacement and the credits and allowances shall be based on the principles established in the gas or electric corporation’s line and service extension rules, if applicable.

(2) The gas or electric corporation shall pay the park or community owner for the appraised value to the gas or electric corporation of any gas or electric distribution facilities found to be
 used, useful, and compatible. If any new facilities are necessary, the park or community owner shall be responsible for the costs of the excavation, installation of substructures, conduit and meter panels, and surface repairs. Except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c), the gas or electric corporation shall be responsible for the costs of any additional construction and equipment replacement, including cabling and transformers.

(c) The proposal shall include the following:

(1) A description of construction and equipment replacement activity, if any, to be accomplished at the park or community owner’s expense.

(2) Requirements for any additional provisions or rights for the construction or maintenance of public utility facilities on park or community premises, including easements and rights-of-way
 acceptable to the gas or electric corporation.

(3) Any specific requirements or costs, or both, with respect to the presence of used and useful materials or equipment that are nonstandard, including, but not limited to, inventory requirements, specialized equipment requirements, or specialized personnel or training.

(4) Any specific requirements or costs, or both, with respect to the presence of exceptional construction conditions or operation and maintenance conditions.

(d) If the actual cost of the engineering evaluation is greater than the gas or electric corporation estimate, the park or community owner shall pay the gas or electric corporation the difference within 30 days of receipt of notice. If the actual cost of the engineering evaluation is less than the deposit, the gas or electric corporation shall pay
 the park or community owner the difference within 30 days. The content of the proposal shall become the property of the park or community owner.

(e) Within 90 days of receipt of the proposal for transfer of ownership, a park or community owner may do any of the following:

(1) Present objections to the gas or electric corporation in writing for resolution and may require mediation of the commission if the parties are unable to resolve the objection.

(2) Decline to proceed, without prejudice to the right to present a new notice at any future date.

(3) Accept the proposal and contract with the gas or electric corporation for completion of the construction work and equipment replacement, if any, or the acquisition of the gas or electric system, or both.

(4) Accept the proposal and contract with an approved third party for completion of the construction work and equipment replacement, if any, in accordance with the applicable gas or electric corporation applicant installation rules.

(f) Any new facilities provided by the gas or electric corporation to extend distribution or service facilities from the existing gas or electric corporation system within the park to previously undeveloped locations shall be provided in accordance with line extension rules and service extension rules contained in gas or electric corporation tariffs filed with the commission, including any and all free extensions, allowances, and advances subject to refund.

(g) Upon completion of construction work and equipment replacement, if any, receipt of appropriate inspection approval from the gas or
 electric corporation and authorities having jurisdiction for the inspections, and completion of all financial transactions among the parties, the park or community owner shall transfer and the gas or electric corporation shall acquire ownership and operational responsibility for the gas or electric system.

(h) Upon receipt of the proposal described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the park or community owner shall notify the park residents concerning the pendency of a transfer process request and the provisions of the transfer process law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2794.

(a) A gas or electric system shall be considered acceptable for transfer if it is in compliance with the following criteria:

(1) It is capable of providing the end users a safe and reliable source of gas or electric service.

(2) It meets the commission’s general orders, is compatible, and, in the case of new construction, meets the gas or electric corporation’s design and construction standards insofar as they are
 related to safety and reliability. The parties may waive these requirements by mutual agreement and, where necessary, with commission approval. The deviations as are agreed upon may be reflected in the purchase price.

(3) It is capable of serving the customary expected load in the park or community determined in accordance with a site-specific study, studies of comparable parks or communities, industry standards, and the gas or electric corporation’s rules as approved by the commission.

(b) As used in this section, “customary expected load” means the anticipated level of service demanded by the dwelling units in the park or community. The park or community owner shall not be responsible for betterments or improvements to the gas or electric corporation’s distribution system facilities or operations that do not benefit the park or community.

(c) Satisfaction of the criteria shall not require any particular system architecture or replacement of used and useful equipment, plant, or facilities, except as needed to comply with subdivision (a). Equipment, facilities, or plant that are part of the existing gas or electric system shall be considered compatible unless their presence in the system would cause substantial increase in the frequency or duration of outages in the case of failure or emergency, or they have no remaining useful life. Pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2793, equipment, facilities, or plant that require special training for the gas or electric corporation’s employees, or require the gas or electric corporation to maintain inventories of nonstandard equipment may be considered compatible, but their presence may be reflected in the appraised value or the cost imposed on the park or community owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2795.

The park or community owner and the gas or electric corporation shall develop a cost for the transfer of the gas or electric system that reflects the factors in Section 2793, indemnity and liability issues, and any other factors as the parties may mutually agree upon, and to which the gas or electric corporation’s ratepayers are indifferent. The parties may agree on a schedule for phasing in facilities to meet expected load increases and betterments, and the costs associated with those activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2796.

(a) During the pendency of a transfer request, the owner of the park or community shall be responsible for the continued maintenance to preserve the integrity of the park or community gas or electric system and safe and reliable operation of the park or community system in accordance with applicable laws.

(b) During the pendency of a transfer request the owner of the park or community shall be liable for injury and damage resulting from operation of the submetered gas and electric
 system. After transfer the gas or electric corporation shall assume responsibility for operation of the gas or electric system and provision of service to residents of the park or community and shall assume liability for any future injury or damage resulting from operation of the gas or electric system except with respect to defects known to the park or community owner and not disclosed to the gas or electric corporation during the transfer of ownership process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2797.

The commission shall permit the gas or electric corporation to recover in its revenue requirement and rates all costs to acquire, improve, upgrade, operate, and maintain transferred mobilehome park or manufactured housing community gas or electric systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2798.

The commission shall adopt a standard form of agreement for transfer of gas and electric distribution facilities in mobilehome parks and manufactured housing communities that shall be the basis for expedited approval of the transfers. The contract shall be based on this chapter, the regulations of the commission, and on gas or electric corporation rules and regulations, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2799.

(a) The mobilehome park or manufactured housing community owner may, by written notice, stop the transfer process at any time. Within 60 days of delivery to the park or community owner of an itemized bill, the owner shall reimburse the gas or electric corporation for all costs incurred through the date notice is provided.

(b) At any time during the transfer of ownership process, either party may apply to the commission for informal mediation and resolution of any issue, finding,
 determination, or delay in the conversion process.

(c) If the initiation of the transfer process does not result in a transfer of the park or community owner’s gas or electric system to the gas or electric corporation, all information, data, reports, studies, and proposals shall be retained by the gas or electric corporation for a period of five years or offered to the park or community owner. Prior to disposal of the records, the gas or electric corporation shall offer them to the park or community owner, except that the gas or electric corporation shall not be required to provide proprietary information to the park or community owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Private Energy Producers [2801. - 2829.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [2801. - 2807.]

2801.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that in order to promote the more rapid development of new sources of natural gas and electric energy, to maintain the economic vitality of the state through the continuing production of goods and the employment of its people, and to promote the efficient utilization and distribution of energy, it is desirable and necessary to encourage private energy producers to competitively develop independent sources of natural gas and electric energy not otherwise available to California consumers served by public utilities, to require the transmission by public utilities of such energy for private energy producers under certain conditions, and
 remove unnecessary barriers to energy transactions involving private energy producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.

“Private energy producer” includes every person, corporation, city, county, district, and public agency of the state generating or producing electricity not generated from conventional sources or natural gas for energy either directly or as a byproduct solely for his or its own use or the use of his or its tenants; or generating or producing electricity, or owning the means thereof, to or for any electrical corporation, heat corporation, state agency, city, county, district, or an association thereof, but not to or for the public for any other purpose. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a private energy producer shall not be found to be a public utility subject to
 the general jurisdiction of the commission solely because of conducting any activity authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

2803.

“Interconnection” means the facilities necessary to physically connect the energy source of and the point of use by a private energy producer with the existing transmission facilities of a public utility, and shall include any necessary transformation, compression or other facilities necessary to make such interconnection effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2804.

“Transmission service” means the intrastate transfer of electricity or natural gas by a public utility for any private energy producer between the points of interconnection for use within this state in the service area of the utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2805.

“Conventional power source” means power derived from nuclear energy or the operation of a hydropower facility greater than 30 megawatts or the combustion of fossil fuels, unless cogeneration technology, as defined in Section 25134 of the Public Resources Code, is employed in the production of such power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1084, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2806.

“Fossil fuel” means a mixture of hydrocarbons including coal, petroleum, or natural gas, occurring in and extracted from underground deposits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.

“Standby charge” means a charge by an electrical corporation for providing standby generation, transmission, and distribution facilities to a private energy producer employing other than a conventional power source for the generation of electricity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 373, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Interconnection of Facilities [2811. - 2816.]

2811.

In order to promote the more efficient use and distribution of natural gas or electric energy and eliminate the necessity for construction of transmission facilities for gas or electricity produced by a private energy producer separate from those which may already exist to serve the same area and are owned and operated by a public utility subject to the jurisdiction and control of the Public Utilities Commission, the commission shall authorize the construction of an interconnection by a private energy producer upon application of such producer if the commission makes the findings required by Sections 2812 and 2812.5. The commission shall render its
 decision on any application filed pursuant to this chapter within 180 days of receipt of the application or at such later time as may be mutually agreed upon by the commission, the applicant, and the interconnecting public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 987, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.

Upon application of a private energy producer, and after notice to any affected public utility and hearing thereon, the commission shall authorize such producer to construct an interconnection for the purpose of transporting natural gas, if the commission finds: (1) that such interconnection is in the public interest and for the general public benefit, (2) involves natural gas located within this state in the service area of the public utility, ultimately consumed within this state, and which would otherwise be undeveloped because a public utility is unable or unwilling to purchase it at a price the commission finds to be
 reasonable, (3) would not cause energy which would likely otherwise be made available to the general public to be diverted to the private energy producer, and (4) that the energy has substantially the equivalent quality and characteristics as the energy in the utility’s transmission system with which the interconnection would be made. The commission shall prescribe such reasonable terms, conditions, and requirements as it deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.5.

Upon application of a private energy producer, and after notice to any affected public utility and hearing thereon, the commission shall authorize such producer to construct an interconnection for the purpose of transmitting electricity, if the commission finds:

(1) That no uncompensated burden will be placed upon the utility or utilities furnishing the transmission service.

(2) That furnishing the transmission service will not result in any added costs or any other adverse consequences for the customers of the electrical corporation.

(3) That the facilities proposed in the application will be used to transmit power from other than a conventional power source for generating electrical power.

The commission shall prescribe such reasonable terms, conditions, and requirements as it deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2813.

The private energy producer shall be required to provide and to pay the total cost of the interconnection as well as any costs associated with providing a transmission capacity sufficient to handle that portion of the energy generated by the private energy producer that is over and above the capacity otherwise required by the public utility to service its utility customers and meet other authorized commitments. The public utility shall not be required to construct any additional electric or gas facilities on its system or to acquire any real property by eminent domain or otherwise for such facilities, in order to perform the service contemplated by this chapter unless the
 cost of such additional facilities or acquisitions are to be borne by the private energy producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.

Nothing in this chapter shall require that any private energy producer perform any service or deliver any commodity to the public or any portion thereof, for compensation or otherwise, except as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2816.

Every public utility shall keep accurate records of transactions with a private energy producer, and of the use of the public utility’s facilities by the private energy producer, pursuant to an interconnection ordered or approved by the commission and shall render such reports thereon to the commission as the commission may from time to time require. The commission may disapprove any such transaction or use if, after hearing, it finds such transaction or use to be inconsistent with this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rights, Obligations, and Charges [2821. - 2829.]

2821.

(a) The commission shall approve and establish equitable charges to be paid by an electrical corporation which purchases electricity or electrical generating capacity, or both, from any private energy producer employing other than a conventional power source for the generation of electricity.

(b) The commission, on its own motion or on application of an electrical corporation or a private energy producer, may also specify the prices, terms, and conditions for the purchase or
 sale of electricity or electrical generating capacity, or both, between an electrical corporation and a private energy producer, and these prices, terms, and conditions, so specified, shall be considered reasonable and prudent for all purposes. The commission may act to specify these prices, terms, and conditions on its own motion or on application of an electrical corporation or a private energy producer.

(c) Every private energy producer employing hydroelectric facilities, who executes a contract with an electrical corporation on or after January 1, 1988, or prior to that date, for the purchase of electricity or electrical generating capacity, or both, shall obtain and provide proof of compliance by the private energy producer with all state laws relating to the control, appropriation, use, and distribution of water, including, but not limited to, the obtaining of applicable licenses and permits. The private energy producer shall also provide
 proof of compliance with the federal Clean Water Act.

(d) (1) For the purpose of providing proof of compliance with all state laws relating to the control, appropriation, use, and distribution of water, the electrical corporation shall require the private energy producer to provide either of the following:

(A) Certification from the State Water Resources Control Board that a water right permit has been issued for the operation of the hydroelectric facility.

(B) Certification from the State Water Resources Control Board that, in the opinion of the board, the private energy producer possesses riparian rights or other water rights which authorize the operation of the hydroelectric facility.

(2) The requirements of paragraph (1) shall
 apply only to contracts involving hydroelectric projects which have not been accepted by the electrical corporation for commercial operation prior to May 18, 1987.

(3) Every contract executed by a private energy producer who is in violation of paragraph (1) is void and unenforceable on and after whichever of the following dates applies:

(A) February 29, 1988, for contracts involving hydroelectric projects which have been accepted by the electrical corporation for commercial operation on or after May 18, 1987, and prior to January 1, 1988.

(B) The 60th day after a project has been accepted by the electrical corporation for commercial operation, for contracts involving hydroelectric projects which are accepted by the electrical corporation for commercial operation on or after January 1, 1988.

(4) The commission shall disallow, for purposes of establishing rates for an electrical corporation, all amounts expended for the purchase of electricity pursuant to a contract that is void and unenforceable under this subdivision.

(e) (1) For the purposes of providing proof of compliance with the federal Clean Water Act, the electrical corporation shall require the private energy producer to provide a statement from the State Water Resources Control Board that certification pursuant to Section 401 of the federal Clean Water Act has either been granted or waived by the board for operation of the hydroelectric facility. The board shall not waive certification unless the board finds that there is reasonable assurance that the project shall comply with all applicable requirements of the federal Clean Water Act and state water quality laws. If the board cannot make
 this finding within the period provided for certification, the board shall either certify upon conditions that provide reasonable assurance of compliance or deny certification.

(2) The requirements of paragraph (1) shall apply only to contracts involving hydroelectric projects which have not been accepted by the electrical corporation for commercial operation prior to January 1, 1992.

(3) Every contract executed by a private energy producer who is in violation of paragraph (1) is void and unenforceable on and after whichever of the following dates applies:

(A) March 1, 1993, for contracts involving hydroelectric projects which are accepted by the electrical corporation for commercial operation between January 1, 1992, and December 31, 1992.

(B) The 60th
 day after having been accepted by the electrical corporation for commercial operation, for contracts involving hydroelectric projects which are accepted by the electrical corporation for commercial operation on or after January 1, 1993.

(4) The commission shall disallow, for purposes of establishing rates for an electrical corporation, all amounts expended for the purchase of electricity pursuant to a contract that is void and unenforceable under this subdivision.

(f) Subdivision (d) does not apply to any private energy producer if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The electrical corporation did not make timely written demand for the proof of compliance required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(2) On or before the date the project was
 accepted by the electrical corporation for commercial operation, the private energy producer was in fact in compliance with all applicable state laws relating to the control, appropriation, use, and distribution of water, including, but not limited to, those laws that require the obtaining of all applicable entitlements.

(3) Prior to October 14, 1991, the private energy producer has provided proof of the applicable certification from the State Water Resources Control Board pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), which proof contains further certification from the State Water Resources Control Board of the existence of the condition identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f).

(g) For purposes of meeting the requirements of subdivision (d) or (e), or of providing certification required under Section 26013 of the Public Resources Code, the private energy
 producer shall furnish information as is reasonably required by the State Water Resources Control Board to document a claim of right, a certification, or a waiver. Every private energy producer requesting certification and a statement from the board pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e), or to Section 26013 of the Public Resources Code, shall pay to the board at the time of filing the request, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to cover the reasonable cost of the board in evaluating and processing the certification request.

(h) As used in this section, “Federal Clean Water Act” means the federal Water Pollution Control Act (Sections 1251 et seq. of Volume 33 of the United States Code) and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2821.5.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Small power producers provide important alternative sources of electrical energy.
